Louisiana, session 2026, SB515.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 51:2401(B) and (C) are hereby amended and reenacted to read as
follows:
§2401. Small Business Innovation Retention Fund; purpose; program administration
* * *
B. The monies in the fund shall be used to provide financial assistance, to
certain Louisiana businesses that have received competitively awarded federal
grants, including the certain Small Business Innovation Research, hereinafter
referred to as "SBIR", or the Small Business Technology Transfer, hereinafter
referred to as "STTR", federal grants.
C. After compliance with the requirements of Article VII, Section 9(B) of the
Constitution of Louisiana relative to the Bond Security and Redemption Fund, all
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1460 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 515
monies received for the purpose of the fund, including but not limited to state or
federal funding sources, shall be deposited into the fund.
* * *